Utah statutes.
16-12-2.   Definition of real estate investment trust.
A real estate investment trust is an unincorporated trust or association which
has complied or intends to comply with Sections 856, 857, and 858 of the
federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, or such sections or section
of any subsequent internal revenue code as may be applicable to organizations
described in Public Law 86-779.
